da: Sporkonfiguration: 1-spor mono; 16-spor; 2-spor mono; 2-spor stereo (halvspor); 4-spor mono; 4-spor stereo (kvartspor); 8-spor; Andet
en: Track configuration: 1-track mono; 16-track; 2-track mono; 2-track stereo (half-track); 4-track mono; 4-track stereo (quarter-track); 8-track; Other
sv: Spårkonfiguration: 1-spår mono; 16-spår; 2-spår mono; 2-spår stereo (halvspår); 4-spår mono; 4-spår stereo (kvartsspår); 8-spår; Övrigt
it: Configurazione delle tracce: 1 traccia mono; 16 tracce; 2 tracce mono; 2 tracce stereo (mezza traccia); 4 tracce mono; 4 tracce stereo (quarto di traccia); 8 tracce; Altro
es: Configuración de pistas: 1 pista mono; 16 pistas; 2 pistas mono; 2 pistas estéreo (media pista); 4 pistas mono; 4 pistas estéreo (cuarto de pista); 8 pistas; Otros
fr: Configuration de piste: 1 piste mono; 16 pistes; 2 pistes mono; 2 pistes stéréo (demi-piste); 4 pistes mono; 4 pistes stéréo (quart de piste); 8 pistes; Autre
el: Διαμόρφωση κομματιού: 1 κανάλι μονό; 16 κανάλια; 2 κανάλια μονό; 2 κανάλια στερεοφωνικό (μισού μεγέθους); 4 κανάλια μονό; 4 κανάλια στερεοφωνικό (τετάρτου μεγέθους); 8 κανάλια; Άλλο
nb: Sporkonfigurasjon: 1-spors mono; 16-spors; 2-spors mono; 2-spors stereo (halvspor); 4-spors mono; 4-spors stereo (kvartspor); 8-spors; Annet
ja: トラック構成: 1 トラックモノラル; 16 トラック; 2 トラックモノラル; 2 トラックステレオ（ハーフトラック）; 4 トラックモノラル; 4 トラックステレオ（クォータートラック）; 8 トラック; その他
ko: 트랙 구성: 1트랙 모노; 16트랙; 2트랙 모노; 2트랙 스테레오 (하프 트랙); 4트랙 모노; 4트랙 스테레오 (쿼터 트랙); 8트랙; 기타
cs: Konfigurace stop: 1stopé mono; 16stopé; 2stopé mono; 2stopé stereo (poloviční stopa); 4stopé mono; 4stopé stereo (čtvrtinová stopa); 8stopé; Jiné
hu: Sávkonfiguráció: 1-sávos monó; 16-sávos; 2-sávos monó; 2-sávos sztereó (félsávos); 4-sávos monó; 4-sávos sztereó (negyedsávos); 8-sávos; Egyéb
vi: Cấu hình rãnh: 1 track mono; 16 track; 2 track mono; 2 track stereo (nửa track); 4 track mono; 4 track stereo (một phần tư track); 8 track; Khác
de: Spurkonfiguration: 1-Spur mono; 16-Spur; 2-Spur mono; 2-Spur stereo (Halbspur); 4-Spur mono; 4-Spur stereo (Viertelspur); 8-Spur; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Configuração de faixas: 1 faixa mono; 16 faixas; 2 faixas mono; 2 faixas estéreo (meia faixa); 4 faixas mono; 4 faixas estéreo (quarto de faixa); 8 faixas; Outro
ro-RO: Configurație pistă: 1 pistă mono; 16 piste; 2 piste mono; 2 piste stereo (jumătate de pistă); 4 piste mono; 4 piste stereo (sfert de pistă); 8 piste; Altele
bg-BG: Конфигурация на записите: 1-писта моно; 16-писти; 2-писти моно; 2-писти стерео (половин писта); 4-писти моно; 4-писти стерео (четвърт писта); 8-писти; Други
pt-BR: Configuração de faixas: 1 faixa mono; 16 faixas; 2 faixas mono; 2 faixas estéreo (meia faixa); 4 faixas mono; 4 faixas estéreo (quarto de faixa); 8 faixas; Outro
tr: İz konfigürasyonu: 1 izli mono; 16 izli; 2 izli mono; 2 izli stereo (yarım iz); 4 izli mono; 4 izli stereo (çeyrek iz); 8 izli; Diğer
ru: Конфигурация дорожек: 1-дорожечный моно; 16-дорожечный; 2-дорожечный моно; 2-дорожечный стерео (полудорожечный); 4-дорожечный моно; 4-дорожечный стерео (четвертьдорожечный); 8-дорожечный; Другой
th: การกำหนดค่าแทร็ก: 1 แทร็กโมโน; 16 แทร็ก; 2 แทร็กโมโน; 2 แทร็กสเตอริโอ (ครึ่งแทร็ก); 4 แทร็กโมโน; 4 แทร็กสเตอริโอ (หนึ่งในสี่แทร็ก); 8 แทร็ก; อื่นๆ
nl: Spoor configuratie: 1-spoor mono; 16-spoor; 2-spoor mono; 2-spoor stereo (half-spoor); 4-spoor mono; 4-spoor stereo (kwart-spoor); 8-spoor; Andere
fi: Raitakokoonpano: 1-raita mono; 16-raita; 2-raita mono; 2-raita stereo (puoliraita); 4-raita mono; 4-raita stereo (neljännesraita); 8-raita; Muu
pl: Konfiguracja ścieżek: 1-ścieżkowe mono; 16-ścieżkowe; 2-ścieżkowe mono; 2-ścieżkowe stereo (półścieżka); 4-ścieżkowe mono; 4-ścieżkowe stereo (ćwierćścieżka); 8-ścieżkowe; Inne
lt-LT: Takelių konfigūracija: 1 takelio mono; 16 takelių; 2 takelių mono; 2 takelių stereo (pusės takelio); 4 takelių mono; 4 takelių stereo (ketvirtis takelio); 8 takelių; Kita
hr-HR: Konfiguracija traka: 1-traka mono; 16-traka; 2-trake mono; 2-trake stereo (polu-traka); 4-trake mono; 4-trake stereo (četvrt-traka); 8-traka; Ostalo
sl-SI: Konfiguracija sledi: 1-sledni mono; 16-sledni; 2-sledni mono; 2-sledni stereo (pol-sledni); 4-sledni mono; 4-sledni stereo (četrt-sledni); 8-sledni; Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia stopy: 1-stopový mono; 16-stopový; 2-stopový mono; 2-stopový stereo (polovičná stopa); 4-stopový mono; 4-stopový stereo (štvrtinová stopa); 8-stopový; Iné
zh-CN: 磁道配置: 1 轨单声道; 16 轨; 2 轨单声道; 2 轨立体声（半轨）; 4 轨单声道; 4 轨立体声（四分之一轨）; 8 轨; 其他
zh-TW: 音軌配置: 單軌單聲道; 16 軌; 雙軌單聲道; 雙軌立體聲（半軌）; 四軌單聲道; 四軌立體聲（四分之一軌）; 8 軌; 其他